Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB234.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 337.327 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Department of Veterans' Affairs shall create and prominently display
on its website a veterans' benefits and services document. The document shall be
made for the purpose of downloading to print and not exceed two (2) standard size
eight and one-half (8-1/2) by eleven (11) inches pages. The document shall include
contact information for and a description of the following resources for veterans:
(a) The Kentucky Department of Veterans' Affairs;
(b) Substance abuse and mental health treatment;
(c) Education, workforce, and training;
(d) Tax benefits;
(e) Kentucky driver's licenses and identification cards;
(f) Eligibility for unemployment insurance benefits under state and federal law;
(g) Legal services; and
(h) The United States Department of Veterans Affairs Veterans Crisis Line.
(2) Every employer subject to any provision of KRS 337.275 to 337.325, 337.345, or
337.385 to 337.405 or of any administrative regulations or orders issued under KRS
337.295 shall[may] download, print, and keep copies of the most recent version of
the veterans' benefits and services document in a conspicuous and accessible place
in or about the premises wherein any person subject thereto is employed.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 11/24/2025 10:19 AM Jacketed